New York, session 2025-2026, A11373.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 2 of chapter 378 of the laws of 2014, amending the 2 environmental conservation law relating to the taking of sharks, as 3 amended by chapter 182 of the laws of 2024, is amended to read as 4 follows: 5 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately and shall expire and be 6 deemed repealed December 31, [2026] 2028. 7 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD15377-01-6